apertium-sme-nob.sme.lexc
LEXICON 2ROMAN !^C^
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-THOUSAND ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND !^C^
 M+Use/Circ:M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MM+Use/Circ:MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MMM+Use/Circ:MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MMMM+Use/Circ:MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !
 MMMMM+Use/Circ:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-HUNDRED ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ;				 !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;				!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED !^C^
 C+Use/Circ:C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CC+Use/Circ:CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CCC+Use/Circ:CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CD+Use/Circ:CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 D+Use/Circ:D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 DC+Use/Circ:DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 DCC+Use/Circ:DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 DCCC+Use/Circ:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !
 CM+Use/Circ:CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-TEN ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ;				!
LEXICON 2ROM-TEN !^C^
 X+Use/Circ:X 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XX+Use/Circ:XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XXX+Use/Circ:XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XL+Use/Circ:XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 L+Use/Circ:L 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 LX+Use/Circ:LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 LXX+Use/Circ:LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 LXXX+Use/Circ:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !
 XC+Use/Circ:XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !
 +Use/Circ: 2ROM-ONE ; !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE !^C^
 I+Use/Circ:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 II+Use/Circ:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 III+Use/Circ:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 IV+Use/Circ:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 V+Use/Circ:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VI+Use/Circ:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VII+Use/Circ:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 VIII+Use/Circ:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !
 IX+Use/Circ:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG; !

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG !^C^
 +Use/Circ: ROMNUMTAG ; !

LEXICON ROMNUMTAG
 +Num+Nom+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +Num+Gen+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +Num+Acc+Use/Circ:%> # ; !
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%.%> # ; ! !III. as ordinal.
 +A+Ord+Use/Circ:%> # ; ! !Looking for trouble...
 +Num+Use/Circ:%: ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ:'7 ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ:%- ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
 +Num+Use/Circ:%´ ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !
! +Num: ROMNUMTAGOBL ; !^C^

LEXICON ROMNUMTAGOBL !^C^
 +Gen+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%>a # ; ! ! But here 123a 123
 +Acc+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%>a # ; ! !
 +Ill+Use/Circ:%>i # ; ! 
 +Ill+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%>ij # ; ! !
 +Ill+Use/Sub+Use/Circ:%>áj # ; ! !
 +Loc+Use/Circ:%>s # ; !
 +Com+Use/Circ:%>in # ; !
 +Ess+Use/Circ:%>n # ; !


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP
 ½+Num:½ # ;
 ¹+Num:¹ # ;
 ²+Num:² # ;
 ³+Num:³ # ;
 ¼+Num:¼ # ;
 ¾+Num:¾ # ;

! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ============================= !
! File containing abbreviations !
! ============================= !

! Lexica for adding tags and periods
! ----------------------------------

! Splitting in 4 groups, because of the preprocessor
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - - 

LEXICON Abbreviation
ITRAB ; 
TRNUMAB ;
TRAB ; 
NOAB ; 
NUMNOAB ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-noun-adj
ab-dot-noun ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-noun
ab-nodot-noun ;
ab-dot-noun ;

LEXICON ab-adj
ab-nodot-adj ;
ab-dot-adj ;

LEXICON ab-adv
ab-nodot-adv ;
ab-dot-adv ;

LEXICON ab-num
ab-nodot-num ;
ab-dot-num;

LEXICON ab-nodot-noun ! The bulk 
+N+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
+N+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill:%>%:i # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Loc:%>%:s # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Com:%>%:in # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ess:%>%:n # ; ! no period, that is.
+N+ABBR+Ill+Use/Sub:%>%:ii # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Loc+Use/Sub:%>%:as # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Com+Use/Sub:%>%:ain # ;! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR+Ess+Use/Sub:%>%:an # ; ! no period, that is. !
+N+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adj
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
+A+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+A+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-adv
 +Adv+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Attr:%> # ; ! no period, that is. 
 +Adv+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
 +Adv+ABBR: RHyph ;

LEXICON ab-nodot-num
!+ABBR:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Acc:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR+Gen:%> # ; ! no period, that is.
+Num+ABBR: RHyph ;


LEXICON ab-dot-noun ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+N+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ; 
+N+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
+N+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
+N+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 
+N+ABBR+Ill:%.%>%:i # ; 
+N+ABBR+Loc:%.%>%:s # ; 
+N+ABBR+Com:%.%>%:in # ; 
+N+ABBR+Ess:%.%>%:n # ; 
+N+ABBR+Ill+Use/Sub:%.%>%:ii # ; !
+N+ABBR+Loc+Use/Sub:%.%>%:as # ; !
+N+ABBR+Com+Use/Sub:%.%>%:ain # ; !
+N+ABBR+Ess+Use/Sub:%.%>%:an # ; !
+N+ABBR: RHyph ;


LEXICON ab-dot-adj ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+A+ABBR+Attr:%.%> # ; 
+A+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
+A+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
+A+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-adv ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
+Adv+ABBR:%.%> # ; ! Adv without case.

LEXICON ab-dot-num ! This is the lexicon for abbrs that must have a period.
! +ABBR:%.%> # ; 
+Num+ABBR+Nom:%.%> # ; 
+Num+ABBR+Acc:%.%> # ; 
+Num+ABBR+Gen:%.%> # ; 

LEXICON ab-dot-cc
+CC+ABBR:%.%> # ; 


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
ab-dot-verb ;
ab-nodot-verb ;
ab-dot-IVprfprc ;

LEXICON ab-dot-verb
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%> # ; ! Period.

LEXICON ab-nodot-verb 
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%> # ; ! No period.
! # ;

! riegádan:

LEXICON ab-dot-IVprfprc 
+V+ABBR+IV+PrfPrc:%.%> # ; ! Period.




! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
! Intransitive abbreviations !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB

Gnr ab-noun ; !
Kildegt ab-dot-noun ; !Kildegata
Kor ab-noun ;
Pb ab-noun ; ! Postbox 
Ref ab-dot-noun ;
b ab-adv ; ! trab in 12. b. 2001 and "lea 30. b. mearidán…, but not in "Bohten geassemánu 3. b. Lean velá dáppe."
kap ab-dot-noun ; !
kr ab-noun ; !
mob:mob9 ab-noun ;
nr ab-noun ; 
r+Use/Circ:r ab-noun; ! !
ref ab-dot-noun ;
s+Use/Circ:s ab-noun; ! !
tlf ab-noun ; !Also used without dot

LEXICON ITRAB
1p+Use/Circ:1p ab-noun; ! !
2p+Use/Circ:2p ab-noun; ! !
3p+Use/Circ:3p ab-noun; ! !
Guovdg ab-dot-noun ; !Plc Guovdageaidnu !
Kap ab-dot-noun ;
Kr ab-noun ; !
Muf ab-noun ; !Musikk i Finnmark
abess:abess9 ab-noun ;
abl ab-noun ;
adess:adess9 ab-noun ;
adj ab-noun ;
adv ab-noun ;
advl ab-noun ;
akk ab-noun ;
akk/gen+Use/Circ:akk/gen ab-noun; !
all ab-noun ;
att ab-noun ;
attr ab-noun ;
bearj+Use/Sub:bearj9 ab-dot-noun ; ! !Bearjadat
c+Use/Circ:c ab-noun; ! 
ess:ess9 ab-noun ;
f+Use/Circ:f ab-dot-noun; ! !
goall ab-dot-noun ; !Goallossátni
ill ab-noun ;
imp ab-noun ;
imprt ab-noun ;
ind ab-noun ;
jna ab-adv ; !ja nu ain !
jnv ab-adv ; !
komp ab-noun ;
kond ab-noun ;
konj ab-noun ;
l+Use/Circ:l ab-dot-noun; !
lád ab-dot-noun ; !lassiárvodivat
lávvord+Use/Sub:lávvord9 ab-dot-noun ; !
m+Use/Circ:m ab-noun; !
milj ab-num ;
ml ab-noun ;
njukč+Use/Sub:njukč ab-noun; ! !njukčamánnu
nom:nom9 ab-noun ;
obj ab-noun ;
osd ab-dot-noun ;
partit ab-dot-noun ; !partitiiva
pc ab-noun ; !personal computer
pres ab-noun ;
pret ab-noun ;
prt ab-noun ;
ru ab-noun ;
sek ab-noun ;
sign ab-noun ;
skábm+Use/Sub:skábm9 ab-noun ; ! !Skábmamánnu
subj ab-noun ;
subst ab-noun ;
suoidn+Use/Sub:suoidn ab-noun; !Suoidnemánnu !
tan ab-noun ; !tangeansa
temp ab-dot-noun ; !temporála
LEXICON TRAB 
Adr ab-dot-noun ; !Adreassa
Edv ab-dot-noun ; !Edvard
Gč ab-dot-verb ; ! Reintrod. !
Innst ab-dot-noun ; !Innstilling
Joh:Joh9 ab-noun ; !Johannes
Kr ab-dot-noun ; !Kristian, Kristin, Kristus
Luk ab-noun ; !Lukas
Od.prop ab-dot-noun ; !Odeldikkeproposišuvdna
Od.prp.nr ab-dot-noun ; !
Ot.prop.nr ab-noun ; !Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
Ot.prop:Ot.prop9 ab-noun ; !
Ot.prp ab-noun ; !
Ot.prp.nr ab-noun ; !Odelstingsproposisjon nummer
Rom:Rom9 ab-noun ; !Girje romalaččaide
Sd.dieđ.nr ab-noun ; !Stuorradikkedieđahus nummer
St ab-noun ; !
St.prp ab-dot-noun ; !Stortingsproposisjon
Vrd ab-dot-verb ; !
adr ab-dot-noun ; !adreassa
ass:ass9 ab-dot-noun ; !assisteanta, assortemeanta
bbl ab-noun ; !Bargobirašláhka
dieđ ab-noun ; ! 30 %dieđ without final dot. !
dieđ.nr ab-noun ; !
dieđ.nr+Use/Sub:dieđ.% nr ab-noun ; !
dr ab-dot-noun ; !doktor
ex ab-noun ; !
geahč ab-verb ; !Must accept no-dot
geassem+Use/Sub:geassem ab-dot-noun; ! !
gč ab-verb ; ! XXX accept no-dot (?) !
juovlam+Use/Sub:juovlam ab-dot-noun; ! !
milj ab-dot-num ; !
omd ab-dot-adv ; !
ordf ab-dot-noun ; !ordførar
overs ab-dot-noun ; !oversatt, oversetter
r+None:r ab-dot-IVprfprc; !
spes.ped ab-dot-noun ; !spesiála
tel ab-noun ; !Used also without dots
vrd ab-dot-verb ; !
A+Use/-Spell:A ab-dot-noun; !
C+Use/-Spell:C ab-dot-noun; !
E+Use/-Spell:E ab-dot-noun; !
G+Use/-Spell:G ab-dot-noun; !
I+Use/-Spell:I ab-dot-noun; !
K+Use/-Spell:K ab-dot-noun; !
M+Use/-Spell:M ab-dot-noun; !
O+Use/-Spell:O ab-dot-noun; !
Q+Use/-Spell:Q ab-dot-noun; !
S+Use/-Spell:S ab-dot-noun; !
U+Use/-Spell:U ab-dot-noun; !
W+Use/-Spell:W ab-dot-noun; !
Y+Use/-Spell:Y ab-dot-noun; !
Æ+Use/-Spell:Æ ab-dot-noun; !
Å+Use/-Spell:Å ab-dot-noun; !
Ö+Use/-Spell:Ö ab-dot-noun; !
Š+Use/-Spell:Š ab-dot-noun; !
Ŧ+Use/-Spell:Ŧ ab-dot-noun;
Ŋ+Use/-Spell:Ŋ ab-dot-noun;
ž+Use/-Spell:ž ab-nodot-noun;
á+Use/-Spell:á ab-nodot-noun;
ŋ+Use/-Spell:ŋ ab-nodot-noun;
đ+Use/-Spell:đ ab-nodot-noun;
ŧ+Use/-Spell:ŧ ab-nodot-noun;
a+Use/-Spell:a ab-nodot-noun; !
c+Use/-Spell:c ab-nodot-noun; !
d+Use/-Spell:d ab-nodot-noun; !
e+Use/-Spell:e ab-nodot-noun; !
f+Use/-Spell:f ab-nodot-noun; !
g+Use/-Spell:g ab-nodot-noun; !
h+Use/-Spell:h ab-nodot-noun; !
i+Use/-Spell:i ab-nodot-noun; !
j+Use/-Spell:j ab-nodot-noun; !
k+Use/-Spell:k ab-nodot-noun; !
l+Use/-Spell:l ab-nodot-noun; !
m+Use/-Spell:m ab-nodot-noun; !
n+Use/-Spell:n ab-nodot-noun; !
o+Use/-Spell:o ab-nodot-noun; !
p+Use/-Spell:p ab-nodot-noun; !
q+Use/-Spell:q ab-nodot-noun; !
r+Use/-Spell:r ab-nodot-noun; !
s+Use/-Spell:s ab-nodot-noun; !
t+Use/-Spell:t ab-nodot-noun; !
u+Use/-Spell:u ab-nodot-noun; !
v+Use/-Spell:v ab-nodot-noun; !
w+Use/-Spell:w ab-nodot-noun; !
x+Use/-Spell:x ab-nodot-noun; !
y+Use/-Spell:y ab-nodot-noun; !
z+Use/-Spell:z ab-nodot-noun; !
æ+Use/-Spell:æ ab-nodot-noun; !
ø+Use/-Spell:ø ab-nodot-noun; !
å+Use/-Spell:å ab-nodot-noun; !
ä+Use/-Spell:ä ab-nodot-noun; !
ö+Use/-Spell:ö ab-nodot-noun; !
č+Use/-Spell:č ab-nodot-noun; !
š+Use/-Spell:š ab-nodot-noun; !
A+Use/-Spell:A ab-dot-noun; !
C+Use/-Spell:C ab-dot-noun; !
E+Use/-Spell:E ab-dot-noun; !
I+Use/-Spell:I ab-dot-noun; !
M+Use/-Spell:M ab-dot-noun; !
Q+Use/-Spell:Q ab-dot-noun; !
U+Use/-Spell:U ab-dot-noun; !
Y+Use/-Spell:Y ab-dot-noun; !
Å+Use/-Spell:Å ab-dot-noun; !
Š+Use/-Spell:Š ab-dot-noun; !
Ŋ+Use/-Spell:Ŋ ab-dot-noun;
ŋ+Use/-Spell:ŋ ab-dot-noun;
c+Use/-Spell:c ab-dot-noun; !
g+Use/-Spell:g ab-dot-noun; !
k+Use/-Spell:k ab-dot-noun; !
o+Use/-Spell:o ab-dot-noun; !
s+Use/-Spell:s ab-dot-noun; !
w+Use/-Spell:w ab-dot-noun; !
æ+Use/-Spell:æ ab-dot-noun; !
ö+Use/-Spell:ö ab-dot-noun; !
